Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIX Provisional Remedies, Enforcement of Judgments, and Exemptions
CHAPTER 426 Enforcement of Judgments

426.005.
Personal judgment in action to enforce mortgage or lien — When mortgage may be enforced.

In an action to enforce a mortgage or lien, judgment may be rendered for the sale of the property and for the recovery of the debt against the defendant personally.

In an action to enforce a mortgage or other lien, a sale of the property may be ordered without giving time to pay money or do other act.

History.

C. C. 374, 376: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.006.
Other liens to be stated in action to enforce lien — Cross claim.

The plaintiff in an action for enforcing a lien on property shall state in his petition the liens held thereon by others, making them defendants; and may ask for and obtain a judgment for a sale of the property to satisfy all of said liens which are shown to exist, though the defendants fail to assert their claims. Such defendants shall not, however, be allowed to withdraw or receive any of the proceeds of such sale, until they have shown their right thereto by answer and cross claim, which shall be asserted as provided in the Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

C. C. 692: trans. and amend. Acts 1952, ch. 84, §§ 1, 27, effective July 1, 1953.

426.010.
Execution against property may issue on personal judgment.

If a final judgment in personam is rendered in any court of record in this state for an ascertained sum of money, with interest and cost, or for either, an execution against property may issue thereon.

History.

1650.

426.020.
Form of execution against property.

The form of an execution against property, varied to suit the particular case, may be in substance as follows: “The Commonwealth of Kentucky, to the sheriff of
. . . . . . . . . .
County, greeting: We command you that of the estate of A B, you cause to be made the sum of $ . . . . .
which C D late in our
. . . . .
court hath recovered against him for debt, with interest thereon from the
. . . . .
day of
. . . . .
until paid; also the sum of $ . . . . .
which to the said C D in the same court was adjudged for his costs in that suit expended, whereof he is convicted as appears to us of record, and that you have the said sums of money before our court on the
. . . . .
day of
. . . . . , to render to the said C D his debt, interest and costs aforesaid and have then there this writ. Witness.”

History.

1651.

426.030.
Execution not to issue for ten days — Exception.

No execution shall issue on any judgment, unless ordered by the court, until after the expiration of ten days from the rendition thereof.

History.

1653.

426.035.
Execution may issue until barred by limitation.

An execution may be issued upon a judgment at any time until the collection of it is barred by the statute of limitation, although no execution may have been previously issued within a year and a day.

History.

C. C. 401: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.040.
Return of execution.

An execution against property by the levying officer shall be returnable to the court in which the action is pending within 30 days after levy but in no event more than 60 days after the execution is issued. Each court shall by an order of record appoint a monthly return day of executions.

If an execution against property is satisfied the officer shall return thereon, in substance, “satisfied,” unless it be by the sale of property in which case this fact must be stated. If satisfied in part, he must state what part and why the residue was not satisfied. If levied and no sale was made for want of bidders, or if no property has been found, he must state the facts.

History.

1651: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 36.

426.050.
Issuance of second or joint executions.

If an execution against property is issued and the plaintiff desires to take out another at his own cost, the clerk may issue it although the previous execution has not been returned. If the execution is returned in whole or in part not satisfied, a new one may issue. On a joint judgment against several persons the execution must be joint.

History.

1652.

426.060.
Order of property sold when joint execution issued against personal representative, heir and devisee.

When an execution is issued jointly against a personal representative, an heir and a devisee, or any two of them, the officer in whose hands it is placed for collection shall sell, first, the estate in the hands of the personal representative; second, the estate descended to the heir; and third, the estate devised. The defendants may, in writing, direct the sale to take place in any order they desire.

History.

1654.

426.070.
Executions of inferior courts. [Repealed.]

426.080.
Counties to which executions may issue — Liability for wrongful issuance.

No execution against property shall issue to any other county than that in which the judgment was rendered, or that in which the defendant resides, until execution has issued to one of the counties named and has been returned endorsed by the proper officer that no property was found, as to all or part thereof. However, if the plaintiff or his agent or attorney makes and files with the clerk of the court in which the judgment was rendered an affidavit stating that the defendant in the judgment has not sufficient property subject to execution in the county in which the judgment was rendered, or in the county in which he resides, to satisfy the judgment, execution shall issue to any or as many counties as the plaintiff directs.

The plaintiff shall be liable to the defendant for any damage he sustains by the plaintiff’s procuring an execution to issue wrongfully under the provisions of KRS

426.080

to

426.110

.

History.

1656.

426.090.
Sheriff not required to leave county to return.

A sheriff shall not be required to go out of his county to return an execution in a civil case. He shall, if the plaintiff has no known agent or attorney in the county, keep a copy and mail the execution, with the return thereon, to the clerk of the court which issued it. When so sent in proper time and manner, the officer shall not be liable.

History.

1657.

426.100.
Plaintiff may designate agent to receive money.

When an execution is placed in the hands of an officer for collection, in a county in which the plaintiff does not reside, the plaintiff may, by endorsement on the execution, name an agent in the county to which the execution is directed, who may receive and receipt for the money collected.

History.

1658.

426.110.
Execution from another county levied on land — Duty of sheriff and clerk.

Where an execution issued in one county is sent to another county where land is levied upon, the sheriff levying the execution shall deliver it to the clerk of the circuit court in his county, who shall record the same as executions are now required to be recorded. After recording it, the clerk shall deliver the execution to the sheriff, who shall return it to the office of the court where it was issued.

History.

1659.

426.120.
Defendant’s estate bound by execution from receipt by officer — Time received to be noted — Priority — Apportionment.

An execution against property shall bind the estate of the defendant only from the time of its delivery to the proper officer to execute. The officer to whom the execution is delivered shall, on receipt of it, endorse thereon the day, month, year and time of day of its receipt by him.

If two or more executions are delivered to the officer on the same day against the same person, he shall satisfy that one first which first comes into his hands.

If two or more executions come to an officer’s hands at the same time and he is unable to make the amounts thereof, he shall apportion the sum made among the several executions so coming to his hands according to their amounts.

History.

1660, 4571.

426.130.
Order in which property shall be levied on and sold.

Property shall be liable to levy and sale under execution in the following order: First, personalty; second, land.

History.

1692.

426.140.
Personalty insufficient, land may be sold.

If there is not enough personal property, the officer may levy on land at the same time and sell a sufficiency thereof to satisfy the execution.

History.

1693.

426.150.
Defendant may select property to be sold — May surrender property not levied on.

The defendant may, on the day of the sale, in writing, direct the property levied on to be sold in any succession he desires. He may produce other property or the title to land in the county not levied on and, by writing, direct the same to be sold first, and in that case the residue of the execution and costs, if any, shall be made out of the property levied on.

History.

1694.

426.160.
Personal property — Time and place of sale — Advertisement.

Personal property may be sold at or in the vicinity of the place of levy in ten days after the levy. The time and place of sale and a description of the property shall be advertised, by posting written or printed notices ten days preceding the sale at three of the most public places in the vicinity of the place of sale, and by newspaper notice if required by KRS

426.560

.

History.

1695.

426.170.
Growing crop — When may be sold — Passes with sale of land.

No crop shall be levied on or sold under execution, attachment or any other legal or equitable proceeding, except an attachment for rent or to secure a mortgage or statutory lien, unless it has been severed from the ground, until after October 1 in each year. But, if the estate of the defendant in the land is liable to be sold, and is levied on and sold, the title to the growing crop may pass by the sale.

History.

1696.

426.180.
Railroads — Property subject to execution — Receiver to enforce judgment.

The rolling stock and other movable property belonging to any railroad company in this state shall be considered personal property, and liable to execution and sale in the same manner as the property of individuals. The earnings, money and choses in action of any railroad company in the hands of any officer, agent or employee may be subjected to the payment of debts in the same manner as similar property of individuals.

If an execution on a judgment against any company owning or operating any railroad in this state is returned by the proper officer showing no property found, in whole or in part, the plaintiff therein may institute an equitable action against the company in the circuit court of the county in which the judgment was rendered to place its road and property in the hands of a receiver. The court, upon a petition showing such return and the failure to pay the judgment, shall, upon the service of summons upon the company, appoint some suitable person as receiver of the company.

The receiver shall take possession and control of all the road and property belonging to and operated by the company, including all rolling stock. The receiver shall operate the road until he has collected a sum sufficient to pay the judgment and costs and the cost of the receivership, and he shall then surrender the road and property to the defendant. The receiver shall first pay out of the earnings and receipts of the road collected by him the necessary operating expenses, including what shall be necessary to keep the road in such repair that it can be safely and properly operated. A bond for the faithful performance of his duties with good and sufficient surety approved by the court shall be executed by the receiver before entering upon his duties.

History.

814.

426.190.
Land liable to execution — What interest defendant must have therein.

Land to which the defendant has a legal or equitable title in fee, for life or for a term, whether in possession, reversion or remainder, or in which the defendant has a contingent interest or a contingent remainder or a defeasible fee, may be taken and sold under execution.

History.

1681.

426.200.
Sale of land — Place of — Advertisement — Appraisement.

Land shall be sold under execution to the highest bidder at the courthouse door of the county in which it lies. Only so much land shall be sold as will satisfy the execution under which the sale is made.

The officer making the sale shall first advertise the time and place of sale by written notice describing the land to be sold, posted at the courthouse door and three other places in the vicinity of the land for fifteen days next preceding the sale, or by newspaper notice if required by KRS

426.560

.

Before a sale of land, the officer shall have the land appraised, under oath, by two disinterested, intelligent housekeepers of the county, who may be sworn by him. If the appraisers disagree, the officer shall act as umpire. If a part of a tract only is sold, the part sold shall, after the sale, be revalued in like manner. The appraisal shall be in writing, signed by the persons making it, subject to inspection by the public prior to the sale, and returned with the execution. The officer shall refer to and explain the proceeding in his return on the execution, which return shall be recorded in full.

History.

1682: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 428, effective January 2, 1978; 2012, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

426.205.
Sale of vacant and abandoned real property to enforce mortgage or lien — Proof of vacancy and abandonment — Confirmation of sale and conveyance of
property.

In an action otherwise properly brought to enforce a mortgage or lien against real property, including a lien pursuant to KRS

65.8801

to

65.8839

or KRS

65.8840

, which has been determined by the court to be vacant and abandoned, a sale of the property shall be ordered expeditiously.

Real property shall be considered vacant and abandoned, for purposes of this section only, if there has been no legal resident or other person legally entitled to occupy the property residing at the property for a period of forty-five (45) or more consecutive days and two (2) or more of the following or similar circumstances which would lead a reasonable person to believe that the property is vacant exist:

Overgrown or dead vegetation;

Accumulation of flyers, mail, or trash;

Disconnected utilities;

The absence of window coverings or furniture;

Uncorrected hazardous conditions or vandalism; or

Statements of neighbors, delivery persons, or government employees that the property is vacant.

Proof of vacancy and abandonment may be offered by affidavit filed at or after the time of filing of the complaint by the plaintiff or other lienholder.

If the court makes a finding in the order of sale that the property is vacant and abandoned, the master commissioner shall sell the property within seventy (70) days of the order.

The plaintiff or other mortgage or lienholder in whose favor the judgment and order of sale were entered shall apply for an order confirming the sale within twenty (20) days of the date of the sale and, unless there have been exceptions to the report of the master commissioner, the court shall act on such application not later than the next regularly scheduled civil motion or rule day.

The master commissioner shall make conveyance of the property on the date the court confirms the sale, or as soon thereafter as all costs and fees have been paid by the foreclosing mortgagee or lienholder, or as soon as a third-party purchaser has paid the purchase price.

History.

Enact. Acts 2012, ch. 93, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2019 ch. 52, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

426.210.
Defendant may designate tract or part of tract to be sold — Duty of officer — Title papers.

If the defendant in execution has an interest as provided in KRS

426.190

in several tracts of land in the same county, he or his agent or attorney may, by writing, direct an officer having an execution against him to make the amount of the execution first out of such of the tracts as he may designate. This direction shall not preclude the officer from levying on and selling other property at the same time to supply any deficiency. Proper title papers shall be delivered to the officer with the directions.

If the whole tract is bid up to the amount required to be made on the execution, the defendant or his agent or attorney if present may designate what side or end of the land shall be sold. If no designation is made, the officer must declare which side or end he will sell, according to what he deems best for the interest of the defendant.

History.

1683, 1687.

426.220.
Redemption — Right of — Payment of money — Possession of defendant.

If land sold under execution does not bring two-thirds of its appraised value, the defendant and his representatives may redeem it within six (6) months from the day of sale, by paying the purchaser or his representative the original purchase money and ten percent per annum interest thereon. The defendant redeeming his land shall take a receipt from the purchaser and lodge it with the clerk of the court, which receipt shall be filed and recorded with the execution under which the sale was made.

The defendant may tender the redemption money to the purchaser or his agent or attorney, if in the county where the land lies or in the county where the judgment was obtained, and if the money is refused or if the purchaser does not reside in either of the counties, the defendant may, before the expiration of six (6) months, go to the clerk of the court where the execution issued and make affidavit of the tender and refusal or that the purchaser or his agent or attorney does not reside in the county where the land lies or where the execution issued, as he believes. He may then pay to the clerk the redemption money for the purchaser, and the clerk shall give a receipt therefor and file the affidavit with the execution in his office.

When the right of redemption exists, the defendant may remain in possession until the right of redemption expires.

History.

1684; 2013, ch. 103, § 1, effective June 25, 2013.

426.230.
Conveyance of land subject to redemption.

Land sold under execution which is subject to redemption shall not be conveyed by the officer making the sale until the expiration of six (6) months from the sale, nor shall he convey after that period if the land has been redeemed or an affidavit made and the money deposited with the clerk as provided in KRS

426.220

, unless by court order or with the written assent of the defendant in the execution.

History.

1685; 2013, ch. 103, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.

426.240.
Redemption right may be sold — Rights of defendant and purchaser.

The right of redemption may be sold under execution. The land shall still be subject to redemption by the defendant, from both purchasers, for six (6) months from the first sale. The purchaser of the right of redemption may, before the end of six (6) months from the first sale, pay the prior purchaser his money and interest as provided in KRS

426.220

, and be entitled to the land, subject to the rights of possession and redemption held by the defendant in the execution.

History.

1686; 2013, ch. 103, § 3, effective June 25, 2013.

426.250.
Conveyance to purchaser by sheriff.

The sheriff who sells land under execution or his deputy or successor shall, on demand, convey the title sold to the purchaser or his assignee, heirs or devisees, if the land is not redeemed and the redemption period has expired.

History.

1688.

426.260.
Motion for possession by purchaser — Notice — Judgment.

The purchaser of land sold under execution and not redeemed, after obtaining a conveyance therefor may, upon ten (10) days’ notice in writing to the defendant in the execution, whose lands have been sold, enter a motion on the docket in the circuit court of the county where the land is situated for a judgment for the possession of the land. If, upon the hearing of the motion, the court is of the opinion that the purchaser is entitled to the possession, it shall render a judgment accordingly and award possession, with costs. The proceedings on the motion shall be as provided in KRS

418.005

to

418.015

, and Rule 6.03 of the Rules of Civil Procedure.

The notice referred to in subsection (1) of this section shall be in substance as follows:

“A B to C D, notice: “You are hereby notified that I will, on the day of , 19, enter a motion on the docket of the circuit court for a judgment for the possession of certain lands situated in county, Kentucky, which lands are described as follows, viz.: (description), being the same lands bought by me at a sale duly held under execution which issued from the office of the clerk of court in favor of , plaintiff, vs , defendant. (See execution book , execution No. ) , A B.”

Click to view

History.

1689: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 37.

426.270.
Proceedings for possession if defendant had no title — Damages.

If, upon the trial of the motion provided for in KRS

426.260

, it appears that the defendant had no title to the land sold under execution, the court may set the sale aside, quash the return of the officer, and award execution for the debt as if no sale had been made. If the land sold had been given up by the defendant to the officer for levy and sale and the sale is set aside, the court shall render judgment against the defendant for ten percent damages upon the amount of the execution, including interest and cost.

History.

1690.

426.280.
Proceedings for possession if title of defendant equitable or encumbered.

If it appears in the proceedings provided for in KRS

426.260

, that the title of the defendant to the land sold was only equitable, or the land was encumbered by mortgage or lien, the court shall, if the purchaser requires it, subject the land to the payment of the debt of the execution creditor in the same manner as if there was a return of no property found. The court may cause such pleadings to be filed and parties brought before the court as may be necessary to a final equitable judgment in respect to the rights of all parties interested.

History.

1691.

426.290.
Sale of encumbered property under execution — Rights of purchaser, creditor — Redemption — Bond of purchaser of personalty — Control of courts.

If the defendant in an execution owns the legal title to any real or personal property on which a bona fide encumbrance created prior to the execution lien exists, the interest of the defendant in the property may be levied on and sold, subject to the encumbrance.

The purchaser at the sale shall acquire a lien on such property for the purchase money, and interest at the rate of ten percent per annum from the day of sale until paid, subject to any prior encumbrance.

Any other creditor, whether by judgment or otherwise, may, after such execution and sale, by equitable proceedings, subject the encumbered property to sale, and, after satisfying prior liens, have his demand satisfied out of the proceeds of the residue. The proceedings in equity shall be instituted before the purchaser has, by suit, enforced the lien provided for in subsection (2) of this section.

The defendant in the execution may redeem the property sold by paying the original encumbrance, with legal interest thereon, and by paying the purchaser his purchase money, with ten percent per annum interest thereon.

The purchaser of encumbered movable property shall, before possession is delivered to him, give an obligation with good surety payable to the encumbrancer and the owner, stipulating that the property shall not be removed out of the county and shall be preserved and forthcoming, unavoidable accidents excepted, to answer the encumbrance, and for redemption, and deliver the obligation to the officer to be returned with the execution.

Courts of equity shall have control of all encumbered property sold under execution, and may make all needful orders for the preservation and forthcoming of the property and its issues and profits, to satisfy the encumbrance and to secure the rights of others.

History.

1709.

426.295.
Form of judgment in action for possession of specific personal property.

In an action for the possession of specific personal property, the plaintiff may have judgment for its delivery, if it can be had; and, if not, for its value and for damages for its detention. If the property have been delivered to the plaintiff, and the defendant claim a return thereof, judgment for the defendant may be for the return of the property, or its value if a return can not be had, and damages for the taking and withholding of the property. There shall be no pre-judgment attachment of specific personal property except under the provisions of KRS Chapter 425.

History.

C.C. 388: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1976, ch. 91, § 38.

426.300.
Specific property — Execution on judgment for.

If a judgment is recovered for a specific thing, the plaintiff may have an execution issued thereon, commanding the proper officer to seize the property, and deliver it to the plaintiff. The plaintiff may, if he so elect, take an execution for the assessed value of the property recovered. In either case, the execution shall embrace the damages assessed for the detention and costs.

The court may, upon satisfactory proof that the property recovered has perished, or that, without the fault of the defendant, it is out of his power to produce it, order the plaintiff to receive the assessed value in lieu of the property.

History.

1665.

426.310.
Livestock — Execution on — Quashed or stayed — Duty and cost of caring for.

If an execution is levied on livestock and no forthcoming or replevin bond is immediately given, the officer shall provide sufficient sustenance for the livestock levied on until it is legally disposed of. The officer shall make a fair estimate of his expenses and collect them, subject to correction by the court. Upon the return of the execution, if either party desires, the court shall fix what the officer shall be allowed for his expenses, which shall be considered a part of the taxed costs in the case and collected accordingly.

If an execution levied on livestock is quashed, enjoined, superseded or suspended, the officer levying it may have his expenses allowed, and issue his fee-bill for and collect his expenses from the plaintiff in the execution. The expenses of the officer, except when the execution is quashed, shall form a part of the costs and be collected from the defendant if the stay or suspension be removed, or, if removed in part only, then in proportion to such part.

History.

1666.

426.320.
Sales invalid if made by fraud or collusion — Proceedings to set aside — When lien not affected.

Sales made under execution by fraud or collusion may be set aside, in the court where the execution issued, on the motion of any person aggrieved or by petition in equity. If by motion, the proceeding must be commenced within one year from the sale. The parties affected by the motion shall have ten days’ notice in writing, setting forth the grounds relied on for invalidating the sale.

Whenever a sale under execution is quashed, vacated or set aside, for any cause not affecting the validity of the execution, the lien created by the execution or the levy shall not be destroyed or affected but shall remain in full force and effect, and a writ as provided in KRS

426.440

may be issued and the property sold.

History.

1710.

426.330.
Purchase by officer at sale made by him void.

No officer shall, directly or indirectly, bid for or buy any property sold under an execution by him or his deputy, principal or codeputy. The right of property so sold and purchased by any such officer, or by another for his use, shall not thereby be changed. Any deed or bill of sale made for property so sold shall be void.

History.

1711.

426.340.
Duty of officer in advertising sale under execution — Returning equitable writ — Defense.

No officer shall delay advertising property for sale, taken by him under execution, for more than twenty days after the levy.

No officer shall fail to return by the return day thereof any writ of execution or attachment for not performing a judgment in chancery or equity which is placed in his hands to execute.

It shall be no defense to an action or motion against a collecting officer for failure of duty of himself or deputy that the plaintiff directed the officer to delay or in any way stay proceedings thereon unless the defense is supported by the written consent or request of the plaintiff or his agent or attorney.

History.

1712 to 1714.

426.350.
Liability of officer for failing to make return in time — Exceptions.

Any sheriff or like officer, in whose hands a writ of execution is placed, who fails, without reasonable excuse, to return the writ to the office where it was issued within thirty days after the return day, shall, with his sureties or the personal representatives, heirs or devisees of either, be liable jointly and severally to the plaintiff in the execution for the amount of the execution, with thirty percent damages thereon and the costs of recovery. The remedy shall be the same as provided in KRS

426.360

.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not apply to any case in which the collecting officer had, at the commencement of the proceeding, paid the plaintiff the amount of the execution. If he had paid in part, then the thirty percent damages shall only be adjudged against him upon the portion unpaid.

If the defendant in an execution is insolvent, and has no property in the county out of which the execution or any part thereof can be made, the collecting officer shall not be held liable for the amount of the execution for failing to comply with the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, but shall be liable for thirty percent of the amount of the execution.

History.

1716 to 1718.

426.360.
Money collected by officer on execution — Liability for failure to pay over — Duty on stay of proceedings — Remedies.

If a sheriff or other like officer receives money on any writ of execution or other process, and fails on proper demand to immediately pay the money to the party entitled thereto or to his agent or attorney, the officer and his sureties or any one of them, or his personal representatives, heirs or devisees, shall be liable to such party for the amount collected and fifteen percent per annum interest thereon from the demand until paid, together with the costs of recovery, legal and extraordinary. The remedy shall be by motion or action in the court where the execution issued. Ten days’ notice of the motion, specifying the grounds thereof, shall be given.

If the sheriff or a like officer collects any money under an execution in his hands, and the defendant obtains an injunction or other writ staying proceedings on the execution before the money is paid over to the plaintiff, the officer must pay the money or the part for which the execution is stayed to the defendant from whom it was collected. Any officer refusing to pay over money as herein directed shall be liable as provided in subsection (1) of this section.

History.

1715, 1719.

426.370.
Payment on execution after return day — Effect.

Any payment made to a sheriff or other officer, or his deputy, on an execution after the return day and while the execution remains in his hands shall be a satisfaction to that extent. The officer and his sureties on his official bond shall be responsible therefor, in the same manner as if the payment were made before the return day.

History.

4585.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Enforcement of Mortgage Liens, § 301.00.

426.380.
Officer paying execution — Assignment — Substitution.

If a sheriff or other officer is compelled to pay an execution or any part of it, by reason of some default of his concerning the same, he shall be entitled to an assignment of the judgment, and a substitution in the place of the plaintiff in the same manner as is provided in favor of a surety paying a judgment.

History.

4671.

426.381.
Proceedings for discovery and satisfaction of judgment.

After an execution of fieri facias, directed to the county in which the judgment was rendered, or to the county of the defendant’s residence, is returned by the proper officer, either as to the whole or part thereof, in substance, no property found to satisfy the same, the plaintiff in the execution may by an amended and supplemental petition filed in the action have the same redocketed and join with the execution defendant or defendants any person believed to be indebted to him or them, or to hold money or other property in which he or they have an interest, or to hold evidences or securities for the same. Upon the filing of such amended petition the case shall be transferred to the equity docket and summons issued thereon. In such supplemental proceeding or in a separate suit in equity against such parties (at his option) the plaintiff may have discovery and disclosure from the judgment creditor and his debtor or bailee, and may have any property discovered, or a sufficiency thereof, subjected to the satisfaction of the judgment.

In such action the plaintiff may have an attachment against the property of the defendant in the execution, pursuant to the attachment procedures provided for in KRS Chapter 425.

History.

C.C. 439, 441: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 100; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1976, ch. 91, § 39.

426.382.
Answer to be verified — Court may enforce discoveries.

The answer of each defendant shall be verified by his oath, and not by that of an agent or attorney, and the court shall, if necessary, enforce full and explicit discoveries in such answers by process of contempt.

History.

C. C. 440: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § l, effective July 1, 1953.

426.383.
Creation of lien on defendant’s property.

A lien shall be created on the property of the defendant by the levy of the attachment; or by service of the summons, with the object of the action indorsed thereon, on the person holding or controlling his property.

History.

C.C. 422: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

426.384.
Court may compel surrender of property.

The court shall enforce the surrender of the money or securities therefor, or of any other property of the defendant in the execution, which may be discovered in the action; and the court may use its contempt power in enforcing surrender of the property.

History.

C.C. 443: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1976, ch. 91, § 40.

426.390.
Execution against the person; when allowed; form; return; estate liable. [Repealed.]

426.400.
Execution against the person; application for discharge; surrender of property; notice; schedule and oath. [Repealed.]

426.410.
Property held for creditors — Sale — Prosecution of actions — Execution against property. [Repealed.]

426.420.
Choses in action — Petition for discovery — Sale.

Where choses in action are brought into court by virtue of a petition for discovery of assets instituted against an insolvent debtor, the court may order their sale upon the same terms as are prescribed for the sale of other personal property. The court shall make all needful orders for the transfer of title to the purchaser.

History.

2185.

426.430.
Judgments in equity — How enforced — Issuance and return of execution.

A final order or judgment in equity for money, land or other specific thing may be enforced by any appropriate writ of execution, allowable on a judgment at law, or by the ancient practice of courts of chancery. The writ shall issue and be returnable as other writs of execution.

History.

1663.

426.440.
Property levied on but unsold — Writ authorizing and commanding sale — Form of — Proceedings.

When the sheriff or other officer makes a return on an execution that the estate levied on, or any part thereof, remains in his hands unsold, a writ authorizing and commanding the sheriff to sell the property may issue.

The writ shall be in substance as follows:

Like proceedings shall be had on the writ as might and should have been had on the first execution. An officer may, at any time after the return day while the original execution is in his hands, sell any property taken in virtue thereof, provided the levy was made before the return day.

“The Commonwealth of Kentucky, to the sheriff of County, greeting: We command you that you expose to sale the estate of A B to the value of $ , which, according to our command, you have taken into your hands, and which remains in your hands unsold, as you have certified to our court, to satisfy C D, the sum of $ , whereof in our said court he had recovered execution against the said A B, by virtue of a judgment in the said court, and that you have, and so forth.”

Click to view

History.

1664.

426.450.
Replevy of judgment allowed before execution issues — Form of bond.

Any person against whom a judgment for money is rendered, except as provided in KRS

426.470

, may, if an execution thereon has not been placed in the hands of a collecting officer, replevy the judgment for three months before the circuit court clerk by giving bond with good surety to be approved by the officer.

The bond, varied to suit the particular case, may be in substance as follows: “This day the defendant AB, together with CD, his surety come before the Clerk of the _________ Court, and undertake that they will satisfy and pay EF or the Commonwealth of Kentucky, the judgment, including interest, if any, and costs amounting to $ _________ , rendered against AB, by this Court, within three months with legal interest on the whole amount thereof from this date.”

History.

1667: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 225; 1976, ch. 91, § 41; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 429, effective January 2, 1978.

426.460.
Executions that may be replevied — Form of bond.

Any execution on a judgment, which could be replevied before the execution issued, may be replevied for three (3) months at any time before a sale of property under the same, by the defendant giving to the officer a bond with good surety payable to the plaintiff, for the amount thereof including interest, costs, and half commission up to that time.

The bond shall be in substance as follows: “We, A B, principal, and E F, surety, do bind ourselves, three (3) months after the date hereof, to pay C D, the plaintiff in execution, the sum of $ _________ , to bear interest from this date, being the amount of an execution which issued from the clerk’s office of the _________ court, on the _________ day of _________ in favor of the said C D, for the sum of $ _________ debt or damages, $ _________ interest, $ _________ cost of suit, $ _________ sheriff’s (or constable’s) half commission, amounting in the whole to the sum of $ _________ aforesaid, against the said A B; and we, A B and E F, his surety have hereby replevied the same. Witness our hands this _________ day of _________ , 19 _________ .”

History.

1669: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 430, effective January 2, 1978.

426.470.
Judgments and executions that may not be replevied.

A judgment to enforce a lien, or against any collecting officer, attorney at law or agent for a delinquency or default in executing or fulfilling his duties, or of a surety against his principal, or upon a debt due by obligation having the force of a judgment, or for specific property or for the property or its value, shall not be replevied. An execution on a sale, replevin or forthcoming bond shall not be replevied.

History.

1668.